Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.020

Arson in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of arson in the first degree if he or she knowingly and maliciously:

(a) Causes a fire or explosion which is manifestly dangerous to any human life, including firefighters; or

(b) Causes a fire or explosion which damages a dwelling; or

(c) Causes a fire or explosion in any building in which there shall be at the time a human being who is not a participant in the crime; or

(d) Causes a fire or explosion on property valued at ten thousand dollars or more with intent to collect insurance proceeds.

(2) Arson in the first degree is a class A felony.

[ 2007 c 218 s 63; 1981 c 203 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.020.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.